Utah statutes.
58-3a-304.    Exemptions from licensure.

(1)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following may engage in the stated limited acts or practices without being licensed under this chapter:

(a)  a person offering to render architectural services in this state when not licensed under this chapter if the person:

(i)  holds a current and valid architect license issued by a licensing authority recognized by rule by the division in collaboration with the board;

(ii)  discloses in writing to the potential client the fact that the architect:

(A)  is not licensed in the state;

(B)  may not provide architectural services in the state until the architect is licensed in the state; and

(C)  that such condition may cause a delay in the ability of the architect to provide architectural services in the state;

(iii)  notifies the division in writing of his intent to offer to render architectural services in the state; and

(iv)  does not provide architectural services or engage in the practice of architecture in this state until licensed to do so;

(b)  a person preparing a plan and specification for a one, two, three, or four-family residence not exceeding two stories in height, exclusive of basement;

(c)  a person licensed to practice professional engineering under Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors Licensing Act, performing engineering or incidental architectural acts or practices that do not exceed the scope of the education and training of the person performing architecture;

(d)  unlicensed employees, subordinates, associates, or drafters of a person licensed under this chapter while preparing plans and specifications under the supervision of an architect;

(e)  a person preparing a plan or specification for, or supervising the alteration of or repair to, an existing building affecting an area not exceeding 3,000 square feet when structural elements of a building are not changed, such as foundations, beams, columns, and structural slabs, joists, bearing walls, and trusses; and

(f)  an organization engaged in the practice of architecture, provided that:

(i)  the organization employs a principal; and

(ii)  all individuals employed by the organization, who are engaged in the practice of architecture, are licensed or exempt from licensure under this chapter.

(2)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict a draftsman from preparing plans for a client under the exemption provided in Subsection (1)(b) or taking those plans to a licensed architect for his review, approval, and subsequent fixing of the architect's seal to that set of plans if they meet the building code standards.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 1996 General Session

